Maryland, session 2025, SB0277.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – General Provisions
1–101.1.
“ACTIVE DUTY” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 9–901 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
1–101.2.
“ACTIVE SERVICE MEMBER” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 9–901 OF THE
STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
1–103.1.
“ARMED FORCES” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 9–901 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
1–114.1.
“RESERVE COMPONENT” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 9–901 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
1–114.2.
“SERVICE MEMBER” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 9–901 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
1–116.
– 3 –

Ch. 260 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
“UNIFORMED SERVICES” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 9–901 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
1–117.
(A) “VETERAN” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 9–901 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
(B) With respect to any State program of benefits, rights, or privileges applicable
to a veteran under this Code, “veteran” includes[, if the individual is eligible under 38
U.S.C. § 101, a member of the commissioned corps of:
(1) the Public Health Service; or
(2) the National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration or its
predecessor, the Coast and Geodetic Survey] AN INDIVIDUAL WHO MEETS THE
DEFINITION OF “VETERAN” UNDER § 9–901 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
Article – Health – General
1–101.
(a) In this article the following words have the meanings indicated.
(A–1) “ACTIVE SERVICE MEMBER” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 9–901 OF
THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
(K–1) “SERVICE MEMBER” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 9–901 OF THE
STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
(M) “UNIFORMED SERVICES” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 9–901 OF THE
STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
(N) “VETERAN” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 9–901 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
4–217.
(c) (1) Except as otherwise provided by law:
(i) The Department shall collect a $12 fee:
1. For each certified or abridged copy of a fetal death,
marriage, or divorce verification certificate;
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 260
2. For a report that a search of the fetal death, marriage, or
divorce verification certificate files was made and the requested record is not on file;
3. For each change to a fetal death, marriage, or divorce
verification certificate made later than 1 year after the certificate has been registered with
the Department; or
4. To process an adoption, foreign adoption, or legitimation;
(ii) The Department shall collect a $10 fee:
1. Except as provided in paragraph (6)(ii) of this subsection,
for each certified or abridged copy of a birth certificate;
2. For the first copy of a certified or abridged death certificate
issued in a single transaction;
3. For a report that a search of the birth or death certificate
files was made and the requested record is not on file; or
4. For each change to a birth or death certificate made later
than 1 year after the certificate has been registered with the Department; and
(iii) The Department shall collect a $12 fee for each additional
certified or abridged copy of a death certificate provided concurrently with an initial
requested death certificate.
(6) (i) The Department may not collect a fee for a copy of a vital record
issued to:
1. A current or former member of the [armed forces of the
United States] UNIFORMED SERVICES; or
2. The surviving spouse or child of the member, if the copy
will be used in connection with a claim for a dependent or beneficiary of the member.
4–402.
On admission of a patient, a hospital, related institution, or mental health outpatient
clinic shall record on the medical record whether the patient is a veteran of the [United
States armed forces] UNIFORMED SERVICES.
5–509.
– 5 –

Ch. 260 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(a) (2) The person designated on a United States Department of Defense
Record of Emergency Data (DD Form 93), or its successor form, as the person authorized
to direct disposition may serve as the authorizing agent for a decedent, if the decedent:
(i) Died while serving in the [United States armed forces]
UNIFORMED SERVICES; and
7–404.1.
(a) In this section, “legal resident” means an individual who maintains the State
as the individual’s principal establishment, home of record, or permanent home and to
where, whenever absent due to [military] UNIFORMED SERVICES obligation, the
individual intends to return.
(b) A dependent of a legal resident of the State who is determined eligible to
receive services from the Administration under this title shall retain eligibility for the
services:
(1) Regardless of whether the legal resident leaves the State due to the
legal resident’s [military] UNIFORMED SERVICES assignment outside the State; and
(2) If the dependent is otherwise eligible for the services.
(c) If a dependent of a legal resident is on a waiting list for services to be provided
under this title, the Administration shall allow the dependent to remain on the waiting list
for services while the legal resident is outside the State due to the legal resident’s [military]
UNIFORMED SERVICES assignment outside the State.
(d) The Administration shall reinstate services provided under this title to a
dependent of a legal resident who resides with the legal resident while the legal resident is
outside the State due to the legal resident’s [military] UNIFORMED SERVICES assignment
outside the State:
(1) On the relocation of the dependent to the State; and
(2) If a request for services is made.
7.5–210.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Eligible individual” means:
(i) [A] AN ACTIVE service member;
– 6 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 260
(ii) A veteran;
(iii) The spouse of [a] AN ACTIVE service member or veteran;
(iv) A child of [a] AN ACTIVE service member or veteran; or
(v) A stepchild of [a] AN ACTIVE service member or veteran.
(3) “Program” means the Sheila E. Hixson Behavioral Health Services
Matching Grant Program for Service Members and Veterans.
[(4) “Service member” means an individual who is an active duty member
of:
(i) The armed forces of the United States;
(ii) A reserve component of the armed forces of the United States; or
(iii) The National Guard of any state.
(5) “Veteran” means a former service member who was discharged from
active duty.]
(b) (1) There is a Sheila E. Hixson Behavioral Health Services Matching Grant
Program for Service Members and Veterans.
(2) The purpose of the Program is to provide funds to local nonprofit
organizations to establish and expand community behavioral health programs to serve
ACTIVE service members, veterans, and their families.
(c) The Department shall administer the Program.
(d) The Program shall award competitive matching grants to local nonprofit
organizations to establish and expand community behavioral health programs that:
(1) Serve the behavioral health needs of eligible individuals in the locality
served by the nonprofit organization;
(2) Meet national standards;
(3) Integrate the delivery of mental health and substance use treatment;
and
(4) Connect eligible individuals to appropriate community–based care in a
timely manner on discharge from the community behavioral health program.
– 7 –

Ch. 260 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(e) (1) To be eligible for a grant from the Program, a nonprofit organization
must have a mission to:
(i) Provide behavioral health services; or
(ii) Provide services to ACTIVE service members, veterans, or their
families.
13–2701.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Behavioral health services” means mental health services or alcohol and
substance abuse services.
(c) (1) “Crisis services” means temporary services designed to address and
stabilize a severe behavioral health problem and to avoid an emergency situation.
(2) “Crisis services” includes hotlines, in–home support, and residential
crisis services.
(D) “ELIGIBLE VETERAN” MEANS A VETERAN WHO IS A MARYLAND
RESIDENT.
[(d)] (E) “Maryland Defense Force” means the military force established under
§ 13–501 of the Public Safety Article.
[(e)] (F) “Maryland National Guard” means the Maryland Army National Guard
and Maryland Air National Guard.
[(f)] (G) “Service coordination” means a service designed to coordinate and
provide assistance in obtaining access to behavioral health services.
[(g) “Uniformed services” has the meaning stated in 10 U.S.C. § 101.
(h) “Veteran” means a Maryland resident who served on active duty in the
uniformed services of the United States, other than for training, and was discharged or
released under conditions other than dishonorable.]
[(i)] (H) “Web–based resource program” means an interactive web–based
communication medium that:
(1) Allows individuals to access comprehensive information, advocacy, and
other resources regarding public and private behavioral health services, crisis and
emergency services, and early intervention and prevention programs; and
– 8 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 260
(2) Enables the public and private health care communities to work
together to address the problems related to providing and obtaining access to behavioral
health services.
13–2702.
(a) Subject to the limitations of its budget, the Department:
(1) In collaboration with the United States Department of Veterans
Affairs, the Maryland Department of Veterans and Military Families, the Maryland
National Guard, and the Maryland Defense Force, shall provide behavioral health service
coordination for ELIGIBLE veterans in all geographic regions of the State to connect them
to behavioral health services, including mental health first aid described under §
13–2703(b) of this subtitle, which may be available through the United States Department
of Veterans Affairs;
(2) (i) Where behavioral health services are not yet available or
accessible through the United States Department of Veterans Affairs, shall provide service
coordination for ELIGIBLE veterans in all geographic regions of the State to connect them
to behavioral health services, including mental health first aid described under §
13–2703(b) of this subtitle, which may be available through the Behavioral Health
Administration, until such federal services can be accessed and obtained; and
(ii) Shall provide behavioral health services through the Behavioral
Health Administration based on eligibility and medical necessity criteria established by
these administrations; and
(3) Shall provide ELIGIBLE veterans up–to–date information about
behavioral health services and resources through a web–based resource program.
(b) Subject to the limitations of its budget and in addition to the service
coordination provided under subsection (a) of this section, the Department shall provide or
fund certain behavioral health services for ELIGIBLE veterans who:
(1) Meet the eligibility and medical necessity criteria of the Behavioral
Health Administration; and
(2) Cannot obtain immediate access to behavioral health services through
the United States Department of Veterans Affairs.
(c) (1) The behavioral health services provided under subsection (b) of this
section may include:
(i) Crisis services in all geographic regions of the State; and
– 9 –

Ch. 260 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(ii) Short–term behavioral health services, where existing federal
and State behavioral health services are determined by the Department to be inadequate
or inaccessible.
(2) The short–term behavioral health services provided under paragraph
(1)(ii) of this subsection:
(i) Shall be available only until [a] AN ELIGIBLE veteran is able to
access and obtain adequate behavioral health services through the United States
Department of Veterans Affairs; and
(ii) May include:
1. Screening assessments;
2. Individual, family, and group therapy;
3. Substance abuse early intervention and detoxification
services; and
4. Substance abuse medication–assisted treatment.
(3) The Department shall seek reimbursement from the United States
Department of Veterans Affairs or other responsible public or private payer for any
behavioral health services provided under subsection (b) of this section.
(d) The Department shall account separately for funds used to provide behavioral
health services to ELIGIBLE veterans under subsection (b) of this section.
13–2703.
(a) The behavioral health services for which the Department provides service
coordination for ELIGIBLE veterans under this subtitle shall include mental health first
aid.
(b) Mental health first aid shall consist of training for ELIGIBLE veterans and
the immediate family members of ELIGIBLE veterans on how to identify and respond to
signs of mental illness and substance use disorders.
(c) Each entity teaching a mental health first aid course shall report to the
Department:
(1) The number of ELIGIBLE veterans who took the mental health first aid
course; and
– 10 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 260
(2) The number of family members of ELIGIBLE veterans who took the
mental health first aid course.
(d) On or before June 1 each year, beginning in 2023, if the Department received
a report under subsection (c) of this section in the immediately preceding year, the
Department shall report to the Governor and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State
Government Article, the General Assembly the following information for the immediately
preceding year:
(1) The total number of ELIGIBLE veterans in the State who took a mental
health first aid course;
(2) The total number of family members of ELIGIBLE veterans in the State
who took a mental health first aid course; and
(3) The total number of mental health first aid courses taught in the State,
reported by the entity that taught the mental health first aid course.
15–134.1.
(a) In this section, “legal resident” means an individual who maintains the State
as the individual’s principal establishment, home of record, or permanent home and to
where, whenever absent due to [military] UNIFORMED SERVICES obligation, the
individual intends to return.
(b) A dependent of a legal resident of the State who is determined eligible to
receive home– and community–based waiver services or other waiver services from the
Department under this title shall retain eligibility for the services:
(1) Regardless of whether the legal resident leaves the State due to the
legal resident’s [military] UNIFORMED SERVICES assignment outside the State; and
(2) If the dependent is otherwise eligible for the services.
(c) If a dependent of a legal resident is on a waiting list for home– and
community–based waiver services or other waiver services to be provided under this title,
the Department shall allow the dependent to remain on the waiting list for services while
the legal resident is outside the State due to the legal resident’s [military] UNIFORMED
SERVICES assignment outside the State.
(d) The Department shall reinstate services provided under this title to a
dependent who resides with the legal resident while the legal resident is outside the State
due to the legal resident’s [military] UNIFORMED SERVICES assignment outside the State:
(1) On the relocation of the dependent to the State; and
– 11 –

Ch. 260 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) If a request for services is made.
15–154.
(a) Unless the child’s family has requested that the child be removed, a child on
the registry for the Autism Waiver shall remain on the registry if the child’s family relocates
out of the State for [military service] UNIFORMED SERVICES ASSIGNMENT.
(b) If a child on the registry for the Autism Waiver becomes eligible for services
through the waiver while the child’s family is out of the State for [military service]
UNIFORMED SERVICES ASSIGNMENT, the child shall be eligible for services through the
waiver if the family relocates to the State.
19–114.
(a) In this Part II of this subtitle the following words have the meanings
indicated.
(d) (2) “Health care facility” does not include:
(iii) For the purpose of providing an exception to the requirement for
a certificate of need under § 19–120 of this subtitle, a facility to provide comprehensive care
that:
2. Restricts admissions to individuals who meet the
residency requirements established by the Maryland Department of Veterans and Military
Families and are:
A. Veterans [who were discharged or released from the
armed forces of the United States UNIFORMED SERVICES under honorable conditions];
B. Former members of a reserve component [of the armed
forces of the United States], AS DEFINED IN § 9–901 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT
ARTICLE; or
C. Nonveteran spouses of eligible veterans;
20–105.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(4) “Serious family hardship” means:
(vi) Assignment of a parent or legal guardian to active [military]
UNIFORMED SERVICES duty.
– 12 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 260
(d) The affidavit shall be in the following form:
(1) I, the undersigned, am over eighteen (18) years of age and competent to
testify to the facts and matters set forth herein.
(2) _______________ (name of child), whose date of birth is _____________,
is living with me because of the following serious family hardship (check each that is
applicable):
_____ Death of father/mother/legal guardian
_____ Serious illness of father/mother/legal guardian
_____ Drug addiction of father/mother/legal guardian
_____ Incarceration of father/mother/legal guardian
_____ Abandonment by father/mother/legal guardian
_____ Assignment of father/mother/legal guardian to active [military] UNIFORMED
SERVICES duty
(3) The name and last known address of the child’s parent(s) or legal
guardian is:
_______________________________________
_______________________________________
_______________________________________
(4) My kinship relation to the child is _________________________________
(5) My address is:
______________________________________________________
Street Apt. No.
______________________________________________________
City State Zip Code
(6) I assumed informal kinship care of this child for 24 hours a day and 7
days a week on __________________ (day/month/year).
(7) The name and address of the school that the child attends is:
______________________________________________________
______________________________________________________
(8) I solemnly affirm under the penalties of perjury that the contents of the
foregoing are true to the best of my knowledge, information, and belief.
______________________________________
– 13 –

Ch. 260 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
Signature of affiant
______________________________________
(Day/month/year)
24–2101.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
[(d) “Veteran” means a former member of the following entities who was
discharged from active duty:
(1) The armed forces of the United States;
(2) A reserve component of the armed forces of the United States; or
(3) The National Guard of any state.]
Article – Health Occupations
1–101.
(a) In this article the following words have the meanings indicated.
(A–1) “ACTIVE DUTY” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 9–901 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
(A–2) “ARMED FORCES” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 9–901 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
(L) “UNIFORMED SERVICES” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 9–901 OF THE
STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
(M) “VETERAN” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 9–901 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
1–701.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(B) “ACTIVE SERVICE MEMBER” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN §
9–901 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
(C) (1) “ELIGIBLE SPOUSE” MEANS THE SPOUSE OF AN ACTIVE SERVICE
MEMBER OR ELIGIBLE VETERAN.
– 14 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 260
(2) “ELIGIBLE SPOUSE” INCLUDES A SURVIVING SPOUSE OF:
(I) AN ELIGIBLE VETERAN; OR
(II) AN ACTIVE SERVICE MEMBER WHO DIED WITHIN 1 YEAR
BEFORE THE DATE ON WHICH THE APPLICATION FOR A LICENSE, CERTIFICATE, OR
REGISTRATION IS SUBMITTED.
(D) (1) “ELIGIBLE VETERAN” MEANS A VETERAN WHO WAS DISCHARGED
FROM ACTIVE DUTY WITHIN 1 YEAR BEFORE THE DATE ON WHICH THE APPLICATION
FOR A LICENSE, CERTIFICATE, OR REGISTRATION IS SUBMITTED.
(2) “ELIGIBLE VETERAN” DOES NOT INCLUDE A VETERAN WHO HAS
BEEN DISCHARGED FROM ACTIVE DUTY FOR MORE THAN 1 YEAR BEFORE THE
APPLICATION FOR A LICENSE, CERTIFICATE, OR REGISTRATION IS SUBMITTED.
[(b)] (E) “Health occupations board” means a board authorized to issue a license,
certificate, or registration under this article.
[(c) (1) “Military spouse” means the spouse of a service member or veteran.
(2) “Military spouse” includes a surviving spouse of:
(i) A veteran; or
(ii) A service member who died within 1 year before the date on
which the application for a license, certificate, or registration is submitted.
(d) “Service member” means an individual who is an active duty member of:
(1) The armed forces of the United States;
(2) A reserve component of the armed forces of the United States; or
(3) The National Guard of any state.
(e) (1) “Veteran” means a former service member who was discharged from
active duty under circumstances other than dishonorable within 1 year before the date on
which the application for a license, certificate, or registration is submitted.
(2) “Veteran” does not include an individual who has completed active duty
and has been discharged for more than 1 year before the application for a license, certificate,
or registration is submitted.]
1–702.
– 15 –

Ch. 260 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(a) In calculating an individual’s years of practice in a health occupation, each
health occupations board shall give credit to the individual for all relevant experience as
[a] AN ACTIVE service member.
(b) Each health occupations board shall credit any training and education
provided by the [military] UNIFORMED SERVICES and completed by [a] AN ACTIVE
service member toward any training or education requirements for licensure, certification,
or registration if the training or education is determined by the health occupations board
to be:
(1) Substantially equivalent to the training or education required by the
health occupations board; and
(2) Not otherwise contrary to any other licensing requirement.
1–703.
A health occupations board may allow a licensee or certificate holder who is a
member of [an armed force] ONE OF THE UNIFORMED SERVICES deployed outside the
United States or its territories to:
(1) Renew the license or certificate after the expiration of the renewal
period without payment of a penalty or reinstatement fee if the late renewal is a direct
result of the deployment; and
(2) Complete any continuing education or continuing competency
requirements or criminal history records check required for renewal within a reasonable
time after renewing the license or certificate.
1–704.
(a) (1) Each health occupations board shall develop a procedure by which an
individual who applies for a license, certificate, or registration can notify the board that the
individual is [a] AN ACTIVE service member, ELIGIBLE veteran, or [military] ELIGIBLE
spouse.
(2) A health occupations board may satisfy the requirement of paragraph
(1) of this subsection by including a check–off box on a license, certificate, or registration
application form.
(b) For each applicant who is [a] AN ACTIVE service member, ELIGIBLE veteran,
or [military] ELIGIBLE spouse, a health occupations board shall assign to the applicant an
advisor to assist the individual with the application process.
– 16 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 260
(c) (1) Each health occupations board shall expedite the process for the
licensure, certification, or registration of [a] AN ACTIVE service member, ELIGIBLE
veteran, or [military] ELIGIBLE spouse.
(2) If [a] AN ACTIVE service member, ELIGIBLE veteran, or [military]
ELIGIBLE spouse meets the requirements for licensure, certification, or registration, a
health occupations board shall issue the license, certificate, or registration within 15
business days after receiving a completed application.
(d) If a health occupations board determines that [a] AN ACTIVE service member,
ELIGIBLE veteran, or [military] ELIGIBLE spouse does not meet the education, training,
or experience requirements for licensure, certification, or registration, a representative of
the board shall assist the ACTIVE service member, ELIGIBLE veteran, or [military]
ELIGIBLE spouse in identifying:
(1) Programs that offer relevant education or training; or
(2) Ways of obtaining needed experience.
1–705.
Each health occupations board shall publish prominently on its website information
on:
(1) The expedited licensing process available to ACTIVE service members,
ELIGIBLE veterans, and [military] ELIGIBLE spouses under § 1–704 of this subtitle; and
(2) Any assistance and services related to licensure, certification, or
registration provided by the board to ACTIVE service members, ELIGIBLE veterans, and
[military] ELIGIBLE spouses.
1–802.
(a) (2) The Department, in consultation with the Department of Veterans and
Military Families, shall provide to each board a list of recommended courses in [military]
UNIFORMED SERVICES culture.
2–4A–14.
Subject to the hearing provisions of § 2–4A–16 of this subtitle, the Board, on the
affirmative vote of a majority of its members then serving, may deny a license to an
applicant, reprimand a licensee, place a licensee on probation, or suspend or revoke the
license of a licensee if the applicant or licensee:
– 17 –

Ch. 260 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(10) Is disciplined by a licensing or disciplinary authority of any state or
country, convicted or disciplined by a court of any state or country, or disciplined by any
branch of the [United States] uniformed services or the United States Department of
Veterans Affairs for an act that would be grounds for disciplinary action under this section;
7–314.
(g) If, when the license of an individual otherwise would expire, the licensee is on
active duty, AS DEFINED IN § 9–901 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, as a
member of the armed forces but not on a career basis, the license is renewed automatically
for a 1–year term without application or payment of a fee.
7–410.
(a) (2) The person designated on a United States Department of Defense
Record of Emergency Data (DD Form 93), or its successor form, as the person authorized
to direct disposition may serve as the authorizing agent for a decedent, if the decedent:
(i) Died while serving in the [United States armed forces]
UNIFORMED SERVICES; and
8–316.
(a) Subject to the hearing provisions of § 8–317 of this subtitle, the Board may
deny a license or grant a license, including a license subject to a reprimand, probation, or
suspension, to any applicant, reprimand any licensee, place any licensee on probation, or
suspend or revoke the license of a licensee if the applicant or licensee:
(3) Is disciplined by a licensing[, military,] or disciplinary authority [in
this State or in any other state or country or] OF ANY STATE OR COUNTRY, convicted or
disciplined by a court [in this State or in any other state or country] OF ANY STATE OR
COUNTRY, OR DISCIPLINED BY ANY BRANCH OF THE UNIFORMED SERVICES OR THE
U.S. DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS for an act that would be grounds for
disciplinary action under the Board’s disciplinary statutes;
8–6A–10.
(a) Subject to the hearing provisions of § 8–317 of this title and § 8–6A–10.1 of
this subtitle, the Board may deny a certificate or grant a certificate, including a certificate
subject to a reprimand, probation, or suspension, to any applicant, reprimand any
certificate holder, place any certificate holder on probation, or suspend or revoke the
certificate of a certificate holder, if the applicant or certificate holder:
(3) Is disciplined by a licensing[, military,] or disciplinary authority [in
this State or in any other state or country or] OF ANY STATE OR COUNTRY, convicted or
– 18 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 260
disciplined by a court [in this State or in any other state or country] OF ANY STATE OR
COUNTRY, OR DISCIPLINED BY ANY BRANCH OF THE UNIFORMED SERVICES OR THE
U.S. DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS for an act that would be grounds for
disciplinary action under the Board’s disciplinary statutes;
8–6B–18.
(a) Subject to the hearing provisions of § 8–317 of this title and § 8–6B–19 of this
subtitle, the Board may deny a license to an applicant, grant a license, including a license
subject to a reprimand, probation, or suspension, to an applicant, reprimand a licensee,
place a licensee on probation, or suspend or revoke a license if the applicant or licensee:
(7) Is disciplined by a licensing or disciplinary authority of any state or
country, convicted or disciplined by a court of any state or country, or disciplined by any
branch of the [United States] uniformed services or the Veterans Administration U.S.
DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS for an act that would be grounds for disciplinary
action under the Board’s disciplinary statutes;
8–6C–20.
(a) Subject to the hearing provisions of § 8–317 of this title, the Board may deny
a license to an applicant, reprimand a licensee, place a licensee on probation, or suspend or
revoke a license if the applicant or licensee:
(3) Is disciplined by a licensing[, military,] or disciplinary authority [in the
State or in any other state or country or is] OF ANY STATE OR COUNTRY, convicted or
disciplined by a court [in the State or in any other state or country] OF ANY STATE OR
COUNTRY, OR DISCIPLINED BY ANY BRANCH OF THE UNIFORMED SERVICES OR THE
U.S. DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS for an act that would be grounds for
disciplinary action under the Board’s disciplinary statutes;
8–6D–10.
(a) Subject to the hearing provisions of § 8–317 of this title, the Board may deny
a license or grant a license, including a license subject to a reprimand, probation, or
suspension, to any applicant, reprimand any licensee, place any licensee on probation, or
suspend or revoke the license of a licensee if the applicant or licensee:
(3) Is disciplined by a licensing[, military,] or disciplinary authority [in
this State or in any other state or country or is] OF ANY STATE OR COUNTRY, convicted
or disciplined by a court [in this State or in any other state or country] OF ANY STATE OR
COUNTRY, OR DISCIPLINED BY ANY BRANCH OF THE UNIFORMED SERVICES OR THE
U.S. DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS for an act that would be grounds for
disciplinary action under the Board’s disciplinary statutes;
– 19 –

Ch. 260 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
11–305.
(c) (2) The Board may waive the requirement of practicing optometry actively
for an applicant who for 3 years:
(ii) Was a [military] UNIFORMED SERVICES optometrist;
13–316.
Subject to the hearing provisions of § 13–317 of this subtitle, the Board may deny a
license or restricted license to any applicant, reprimand any licensee or holder of a
restricted license, place any licensee or holder of a restricted license on probation, or
suspend or revoke a license or restricted license if the applicant, licensee, or holder:
(10) Is disciplined by a licensing or disciplinary authority of any state or
country or convicted or disciplined by a court of any state or country or disciplined by any
branch of the [United States] uniformed services or Veterans Administration for an act
that would be grounds for disciplinary action under the Board’s disciplinary statutes;
14–302.
Subject to the rules, regulations, and orders of the Board, the following individuals
may practice medicine without a license:
(2) A physician licensed by and residing in another jurisdiction, if the
physician:
(iii) Is engaged in clinical training or participates in training or
teaching of a skill or procedure in a hospital if:
4. The visiting physician has no history of any medical
disciplinary action in any other state, territory, nation, or any branch of the [United States]
uniformed services or the Veterans Administration, and has no significant detrimental
malpractice history;
14–404.
(a) Subject to the hearing provisions of § 14–405 of this subtitle, a disciplinary
panel, on the affirmative vote of a majority of the quorum of the disciplinary panel, may
reprimand any licensee, place any licensee on probation, or suspend or revoke a license if
the licensee:
(21) Is disciplined by a licensing or disciplinary authority or convicted or
disciplined by a court of any state or country or disciplined by any branch of the [United
States] uniformed services or the Veterans’ Administration for an act that would be
grounds for disciplinary action under this section;
– 20 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 260
14–5A–17.
(a) Subject to the hearing provisions of § 14–405 of this title, a disciplinary panel,
on the affirmative vote of a majority of a quorum of the disciplinary panel, may deny a
license to any applicant, reprimand any licensee, place any licensee on probation, or
suspend or revoke a license, if the applicant or licensee:
(17) Is disciplined by a licensing or disciplinary authority or is convicted or
disciplined by a court of any state or country or is disciplined by any branch of the [United
States] uniformed services or the Veterans’ Administration for an act that would be
grounds for disciplinary action under the Board’s disciplinary statutes;
14–5B–14.
(a) Subject to the hearing provisions of § 14–405 of this title, a disciplinary panel,
on the affirmative vote of a majority of the quorum of the disciplinary panel, may deny a
license to any applicant, reprimand any licensee, place any licensee on probation, or
suspend or revoke a license, if the applicant or licensee:
(17) Is disciplined by a licensing or disciplinary authority or is convicted or
disciplined by a court of any state or country or is disciplined by any branch of the [United
States] uniformed services or the Veterans’ Administration for an act that would be
grounds for disciplinary action under the Board’s disciplinary statutes;
14–5C–17.
(a) Subject to the hearing provisions of § 14–405 of this title, a disciplinary panel,
on the affirmative vote of a majority of a quorum of the disciplinary panel, may deny a
license to any applicant, reprimand any licensee, place any licensee on probation, or
suspend or revoke a license, if the applicant or licensee:
(18) Is disciplined by a licensing or disciplinary authority or is convicted or
disciplined by a court of any state or country or is disciplined by any branch of the [United
States] uniformed services or the U.S. Department of Veterans Affairs for an act that would
be grounds for disciplinary action under the Board’s disciplinary statutes;
14–5D–11.4.
(b) (1) The Board shall issue an approval to perform dry needling to a licensed
athletic trainer who provides proof of completion of at least 80 hours of instruction in a
continuing education course approved by:
(iii) The [United States] armed forces.
14–5D–14.
– 21 –

Ch. 260 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(a) Subject to the hearing provisions of § 14–405 of this title, a disciplinary panel,
on the affirmative vote of a majority of a quorum of the disciplinary panel, may deny a
license to any applicant, reprimand any licensee, place any licensee on probation, or
suspend or revoke a license, if the applicant or licensee:
(17) Is disciplined by a licensing, certifying, or disciplinary authority or is
convicted or disciplined by a court of any state or country or is disciplined by any branch of
the [United States] uniformed services or the Veterans Administration for an act that
would be grounds for disciplinary action under this section;
14–5E–16.
(a) Subject to the hearing provisions of § 14–405 of this title, a disciplinary panel,
on the affirmative vote of a majority of the quorum of the disciplinary panel, may deny a
license to any applicant, reprimand any licensee, place any licensee on probation, or
suspend or revoke a license, if the applicant or licensee:
(18) Is disciplined by a licensing or disciplinary authority or is convicted or
disciplined by a court of any state or country or is disciplined by any branch of the [United
States] uniformed services or the U.S. Department of Veterans Affairs for an act that would
be grounds for disciplinary action under the Board’s disciplinary statutes;
14–5G–18.
(a) Subject to the hearing provisions of § 14–405 of this title, a disciplinary panel,
on the affirmative vote of a majority of the quorum of the disciplinary panel, may deny a
license to any applicant, reprimand any licensee, place any licensee on probation, or
suspend or revoke a license, if the applicant or licensee:
(19) Is disciplined by a licensing or disciplinary authority or is convicted or
disciplined by a court of any state or country or is disciplined by any branch of the [United
States] uniformed services or the U.S. Department of Veterans Affairs for an act that would
be grounds for disciplinary action under the Board’s disciplinary statutes;
15–314.
(a) Subject to the hearing provisions of § 15–315 of this subtitle, a disciplinary
panel, on the affirmative vote of a majority of the quorum, may reprimand any physician
assistant, place any physician assistant on probation, or suspend or revoke a license if the
physician assistant:
(21) Is disciplined by a licensing or disciplinary authority or convicted or
disciplined by a court of any state or country or disciplined by any branch of the [United
– 22 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 260
States] uniformed services or the Veterans’ Administration for an act that would be
grounds for disciplinary action under this section;
16–311.
(a) Subject to the hearing provisions of § 16–313 of this subtitle, the Board, on the
affirmative vote of a majority of its members then serving, may deny a license or a limited
license to any applicant, reprimand any licensee or holder of a limited license, impose an
administrative monetary penalty not exceeding $50,000 on any licensee or holder of a
limited license, place any licensee or holder of a limited license on probation, or suspend or
revoke a license or a limited license if the applicant, licensee, or holder:
(21) Has been disciplined by a licensing or disciplinary authority of any state
or country or convicted or disciplined by a court of any state or country or disciplined by
any branch of the [United States] uniformed services or the United States Veterans
Administration for an act that would be grounds for disciplinary action under this section;
17–6A–19.
Subject to the hearing provisions of § 17–6A–21 of this subtitle, the Board, on the
affirmative vote of a majority of its members then serving, may deny a license to any
applicant, reprimand any licensee, place any licensee on probation, or suspend or revoke a
license of any licensee if the applicant or licensee:
(10) Is disciplined by a licensing or disciplinary authority of any state or
country or convicted or disciplined by a court of any state or country or disciplined by any
branch of the [United States] uniformed services or the United States Veterans
Administration for an act that would be grounds for disciplinary action under the Board’s
disciplinary statutes;
18–313.
Subject to the hearing provisions of § 18–315 of this subtitle, the Board, on the
affirmative vote of a majority of its members then serving, may deny a license or
registration to any applicant, reprimand any licensee or registrant, place any licensee or
registrant on probation, or suspend or revoke a license or registration of any licensee or
registrant if the applicant, licensee, or registrant:
(11) Is disciplined by a licensing or disciplinary authority of any state or
country or convicted or disciplined by a court of any state or country or disciplined by any
branch of the [United States] uniformed services or the United States Veterans
Administration for an act that would be grounds for disciplinary action under the Board’s
disciplinary statutes;
Article – Housing and Community Development
– 23 –

Ch. 260 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
1–101.
(a) In this Division I of this article the following words have the meanings
indicated.
(K) “VETERAN” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 9–901 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
4–2906.
The Department and each public housing agency shall equally prioritize vouchers
and housing assistance payments for families that include:
(1) a child who is under the age of 18 years;
(2) a foster child who is:
(i) at least 18 years old; but
(ii) under the age of 24 years;
(3) a [military] veteran;
(4) an individual experiencing homelessness;
(5) a disabled individual; or
(6) an elderly individual.
Article – State Government
9–901.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(B) “ACTIVE DUTY” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN 37 U.S.C. § 101.
(C) “ACTIVE SERVICE MEMBER” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL WHO IS:
(1) AN ACTIVE DUTY MEMBER OF THE UNIFORMED SERVICES; OR
(2) SERVING IN A RESERVE COMPONENT OF THE UNIFORMED
SERVICES ON ACTIVE DUTY ORDERS.
(D) “ARMED FORCES” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN 10 U.S.C. § 101.
– 24 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 260
[(b)] (E) “Board” means the Board of Trustees of the Maryland Veterans Trust.
[(c)] (F) “Department” means the Department of Veterans and Military
Families.
(G) “MILITARY FAMILY” INCLUDES THE SPOUSE AND DEPENDENT
CHILDREN OF A SERVICE MEMBER OR VETERAN RELATED BY BLOOD, MARRIAGE, OR
ADOPTION.
(H) “RESERVE COMPONENT” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN 37 U.S.C. § 101.
[(d)] (I) “Secretary” means the Secretary of Veterans and Military Families.
(J) “SERVICE MEMBER” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL WHO IS A MEMBER OF:
(1) THE UNIFORMED SERVICES; OR
(2) A RESERVE COMPONENT OF THE UNIFORMED SERVICES.
[(e)] (K) “Trust” means the Maryland Veterans Trust.
(L) “UNIFORMED SERVICES” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN 37 U.S.C. § 101.
[(f)] (M) Except as otherwise provided [in this subtitle], “veteran” [means an
individual who served on active duty in the armed forces of the United States, other than
for training, and was discharged or released under conditions other than dishonorable] HAS
THE MEANING STATED IN 38 U.S.C. § 101.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 6, 2025.
– 25 –